Illinois, session 104th, SB4193.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Farmer 5Tax Benefit Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose and findings. The General Assembly 7finds that:8        (1) The State of Illinois' unique natural resources, 9    wildlife habitats, open spaces, agricultural and forested 10    resources, wetlands, and historical, cultural, and 11    archaeological resources are of significant economic, 12    environmental, and social benefit to the State and the 13    public.14        (2) The Illinois economy is vulnerable to other states 15    that have financial incentive programs targeted to support 16    the protection of unique natural and agricultural 17    resources. Illinois should advance new tools to ensure 18    that Illinois offers a competitive quality of life and is 19    desirable in site location decision-making for businesses.20        (3) Natural carbon storage and increasing carbon 21    sequestration from natural and working lands is a critical 22    component of State and national deep decarbonization 23    strategies because the maintenance of existing sequestered   SB4193- 2 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1    carbon in intact natural and working lands systems can be 2    among the most cost-effective ways to support climate 3    goals.4        (4) The protection of natural and working lands is an 5    important climate adaptation strategy, with land 6    conservation serving to build community resilience against 7    extreme weather events, such as by absorbing excess 8    rainwater to reduce flooding, filtering pollutants, 9    offering cooling from extreme heat, preserving 10    biodiversity, ensuring species' corridor migration, and 11    protecting productive farmland that provides food 12    security.13        (5) Many of the State's unique natural, historical, 14    agricultural, and open space resources and habitats are 15    found on lands that are privately owned. The General 16    Assembly intends to provide private landowners with 17    incentives to encourage voluntary protection of private 18    lands for open space, natural resources, biodiversity 19    conservation, water supply, outdoor recreation, farmland 20    and forestland preservation, historic preservation, and 21    land conservation purposes. 22    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:23    "Conservation agency" means the following:24        (1) the State of Illinois;25        (2) a federal agency;  SB4193- 3 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1        (3) a unit of local government;2        (4) a federally recognized Indian tribe; or3        (5) a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization that has 4    experience acquiring conservation real estate, whether 5    through purchase, donation, or transfer, and that meets 6    the requirements of Section 170(h)(3) of the Internal 7    Revenue Code and the regulations adopted under that 8    Section. 9    A conservation agency must also:10        (1) be authorized to acquire, hold, and maintain title 11    to real estate or interests in real estate in Illinois; 12        (2) be organized and operated for purposes expressly 13    including natural resource protection, land conservation, 14    or historic preservation; and15        (3) meet other criteria or certifications required by 16    the Department by rule.17    Any non-profit corporation that is accredited through the 18Land Trust Accreditation Commission shall automatically be 19deemed a conservation agency with no further burden of proof.20    "Credit" means the Illinois Land Protection Credit created 21and administered as outlined in this Act.22    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.23    "Federally recognized Indian tribe" means any Indian tribe 24that is included on the list of federally recognized Indian 25tribes that is published from time to time by the United States 26Department of the Interior under the Federally Recognized   SB4193- 4 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1Indian Tribe List Act of 1994.2    "Landowner" means the owner of fee simple title to land, 3as evidenced by the county real property records in the county 4where the real property interest is located, including, 5without limitation, individuals, trusts and estates, and 6entities such as limited liability companies, partnerships, 7and corporations, whether for profit or not-for-profit.8    "Land protection agreement" means a restriction on the use 9that may be made of real property that is granted in perpetuity 10and created pursuant to Illinois real property law and that 11complies with Section 170(h)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue 12Code.13    "Qualified appraisal" has the same meaning as that term is 14defined in 26 CFR 1.170A-17.15    "Qualified appraiser" has the same meaning as that term is 16defined in 26 CFR 1.170A-17.17    "Qualified donation" means the transfer and conveyance by 18gift, without consideration, of all or a portion, including 19bargain sales, of a qualified real property interest to a 20conservation agency if those purposes are secured in 21perpetuity through recording of a deed in the real property 22records in the county where the qualified real property 23interest is located.24    "Qualified real property interest" means any of the 25following interests in real property located in the State of 26Illinois:  SB4193- 5 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1        (1) a fee simple interest;2        (2) a remainder interest; or3        (3) a land protection agreement.4    A fee simple interest or remainder interest shall not be 5deemed a qualified real property interest unless the 6conservation and preservation purposes are assured in 7perpetuity. In these cases, the credit shall not be allowed 8until the conservation agency agrees in recorded documentation 9that any subsequent conveyances of the fee simple or remainder 10interest in the property will be subject to a prior conveyance 11in perpetuity of a land protection agreement or will be 12conveyed to another conservation agency. 13    Section 15. Credit availability. 14    (a) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 152027, landowners may apply to the Department for a credit 16against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 17201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act in an amount equal to either 18(i) 100% of the fair market value of a qualified donation of a 19land protection agreement or (ii) 50% of the fair market value 20of the qualified donation of a fee simple interest or a 21remainder interest in qualified real property. The fair market 22value of any donation made under this Section shall be 23substantiated by a qualified appraisal prepared by a qualified 24appraiser. 25    (b) The total aggregate amount of tax credits issued under   SB4193- 6 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1this Act in any State fiscal year shall not exceed $7,500,000. 2Tax credits shall be allocated on a first-come, first-served 3basis. The Department shall log applications as they are 4received. If the $7,500,000 total aggregate cap is exceeded in 5any one year, the Department shall issue a certificate of tax 6credit to be available to the landowner in the subsequent tax 7year with an effective date of the subsequent year.8    (c) The amount of the credit that may be claimed by a 9landowner for any single qualified donation shall not exceed 10$500,000.11    (d) The credit under this Act is exempt from the 12provisions of Section 250 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. 13    Section 20. Credit allocation by the Department.14    (a) A landowner seeking to claim a tax credit under 15Section 15 shall, in either the year of the donation or the 16year following the year of donation, submit to the Department 17an application for a land protection tax credit on a form to be 18created by the Department. The application shall be 19accompanied by the qualified appraisal substantiating the 20value of the qualified donation and the deed transferring the 21qualified real property interest. If the landowner is a 22pass-through entity, the application shall also include 23documentation that the landowner has owned the property for 24more than 3 years at the time of the donation or otherwise 25meets the family exception set forth in Section 40.  SB4193- 7 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1    (b) On receipt of the application and all supporting 2documentation, the Department shall either (i) record the 3transaction and provide the landowner with a certificate 4acknowledging the credit, together with a tracking number, on 5a form to be created by the Department, (ii) request more 6information, or (iii) decline to issue the certificate by 7providing a written statement of the deficiencies in the 8application. The landowner shall have an opportunity to cure 9any deficiencies. Upon satisfactory review of the application, 10the Department shall issue the certificate stating the amount 11of the tax credit.12    If the landowner is receiving compensation for any 13non-donated portion of a qualified real property interest and 14that compensation derives from a federal, State, or local 15public conservation funding source, then the landowner shall 16include, with the application, documentation confirming the 17award of public funding towards the qualified real property 18interest. In that case, the public funding award shall be 19determinative of the conservation benefit and value, no 20additional review by the Department shall be necessary, and 21the credit shall be automatically granted and the certificate 22automatically issued.23    (c) No single landowner may apply for more than one credit 24per year. 25    Section 25. Allowable credit use.  SB4193- 8 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1    (a) The credit shall be taken in the taxable year in which 2the tax certificate is issued. In no event shall a credit under 3this Section reduce the taxpayer's liability to less than 4zero. If the amount of the credit exceeds the income tax 5liability for the applicable tax year, the excess may be 6carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 7taxable years following the excess credit year. The credit 8shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 9liability. If there are credits from more than one year that 10are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall 11be applied first.12    (b) The landowner, at its option, may elect to transfer, 13rather than claim, the tax credit. A sale, assignment, or 14transfer of the tax credit may be made by the landowner earning 15the credit within one year after the certificate of tax credit 16is issued by the Department. Upon notice of a transfer, the 17Department shall issue transfer certificates to the transferor 18and transferee that identify the amount of the credit 19transferred. Upon issuance of the transfer certificates, the 20transferor relinquishes all rights to the portion of the 21credit that was transferred. The transferred credit may be 22applied by the transferee against its tax imposed by the 23Illinois Income Tax Act, and any credit not used by the 24transferee may be carried forward for a 5-year carry forward 25period. A landowner seeking to transfer a credit shall submit 26to the Department a Notice of Tax Credit Transfer on a form to   SB4193- 9 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1be created by the Department. Upon any transfer of a credit, a 2fee equal to 3% of the amount of the credit so transferred 3shall be paid to the Department by the landowner to cover the 4administrative costs of this process. 5    Section 30. Powers of the Department. 6    (a) The Department, in addition to those powers granted 7under the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, is granted 8and has all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and 9effectuate the purposes and provisions of this Act, including, 10but not limited to, power and authority to:11        (1) Adopt rules deemed necessary and appropriate for 12    the administration of the tax credit program.13        (2) Establish forms for applications, notifications, 14    contracts, or any other agreements and accept applications 15    at any time during the year.16        (3) Assist applicants pursuant to the provisions of 17    this Act to promote, foster, and support land conservation 18    and its related benefits within the State.19        (4) Gather information and conduct inquiries in the 20    manner and by the methods as it deems desirable.21        (5) Provide for sufficient personnel to permit 22    administration, staffing, operation, and related support 23    required to adequately discharge its duties and 24    responsibilities described in this Act from funds as may 25    be appropriated by the General Assembly for the   SB4193- 10 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1    administration of this Act.2        (6) Require applicants, upon written request, to issue 3    any necessary authorization to the appropriate federal, 4    State, or local authority for the release of information 5    concerning a project being considered under the provisions 6    of this Act, with the information requested to include, 7    but not be limited to, financial reports, returns, or 8    records.9    (b) The Department shall adopt rules within 12 months 10after the effective date of this Act. 11    Section 35. Analysis of the Illinois Land Protection Tax 12Credit. 13    (a) By December 31, 2032, the Department, in consultation 14with other State agencies as needed, shall prepare a report 15detailing the amount of land and the fair market value of land 16protected during the reporting period pursuant to this Act. 17The Department may consider application and attestation 18information provided by eligible landowners pursuant to this 19Act and any other data it deems relevant.20    (b) The final report shall be made publicly available, and 21copies of the final report shall be filed with the General 22Assembly and the Governor. 23    Section 40. Applicability and limitations. 24    (a) For taxable years ending on or after December 31,   SB4193- 11 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b12027, for partners and shareholders of Subchapter S 2corporations, the provisions of Section 251 shall apply with 3respect to the credit under this subsection. 4    (b) In the case of a pass-through entity described in 5subsection (a), no qualified donation shall be eligible for a 6tax credit under this Act unless the entity acquired the land 7or qualified real property interest 3 or more years before the 8donation for which the qualified donation is being sought.9    (c) Subsection (b) shall not apply with respect to any 10qualified donation by any partnership or pass-through entity 11for which a tax credit is being sought under this Act if 12substantially all of the partnership interests or pass-through 13entity interests in the partnership or pass-through entity are 14held, directly or indirectly, by an individual or members of 15the individual's family. 16    As used in this subsection, "member of the family" means 17the individual's spouse or any person who bears a relationship 18to the individual that is described in Internal Revenue Code 19Section 152(d)(2) subparagraphs (A) through (G).20    (d) If a conservation agency becomes unqualified after the 21effective date of a qualified donation, it shall not require 22any taxpayer to repay tax credits claimed under this Act, nor 23shall such event be cause for any other penalty to be imposed 24on a taxpayer.  25    Section 45. Construction.   SB4193- 12 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be interpreted to in any way 2alter or amend any permit requirements, reporting 3requirements, allocation procedures, or other requirements set 4forth in any other provision of State law.5    (b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 6a land protection agreement held pursuant to this Section 7shall be construed in favor of achieving the conservation 8purposes for which it was created. 9    Section 900. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 10adding Section 253 as follows: 11    (35 ILCS 5/253 new)12    Sec. 253. Land Protection Tax Credit.13    (a) A landowner who has been awarded a credit under the 14Farmer Tax Benefit Act is entitled to a credit as provided in 15that Act and in this Section. 16    (b) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 172027, landowners may apply to the Department of Natural 18Resources for a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 19(a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to either (i) 20100% of the fair market value of a qualified donation of a land 21protection agreement or (ii) 50% of the fair market value of 22the qualified donation of a fee simple interest or a remainder 23interest in qualified real property. The fair market value of 24any donation made under this Section shall be substantiated by   SB4193- 13 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1a qualified appraisal prepared by a qualified appraiser. 2    (c) The total aggregate amount of tax credits issued under 3this Act in any State fiscal year shall not exceed $7,500,000. 4    (d) The credit shall be taken in the taxable year in which 5the tax certificate is issued. In no event shall a credit under 6this Section reduce the taxpayer's liability to less than 7zero. If the amount of the credit exceeds the income tax 8liability for the applicable tax year, the excess may be 9carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 10taxable years following the excess credit year. The credit 11shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 12liability. If there are credits from more than one year that 13are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall 14be applied first. 15    (e) The landowner, at its option, may decide to transfer, 16rather than claim, the tax credit. A sale, assignment, or 17transfer of the tax credit may be made by the landowner earning 18the credit within one year after the certificate of tax credit 19is issued by the Department of Natural Resources. Upon notice 20of transfer, the Department of Natural Resources shall issue 21transfer certificates to the transferor and transferee that 22identify the amount of the credit transferred. Upon issuance 23of the transfer certificates, the transferor relinquishes all 24rights to the portion of the credit that was transferred. The 25transferred credit may be applied by the transferee against 26its tax imposed by this Act, and any credit not used by the   SB4193- 14 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1transferee may be carried forward for a 5-year carry forward 2period. 3    (f) The amount of the credit that may be claimed by a 4landowner for any single qualified donation shall not exceed 5$500,000. 6    (g) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 72027, for partners and shareholders of Subchapter S 8corporations, the provisions of Section 251 shall apply with 9respect to the credit under this Section. 10    (h) In the case of a pass-through entity described in 11subsection (g), no qualified donation shall be eligible for a 12tax credit under this Act unless the entity acquired the land 13or qualified real property interest 3 or more years before the 14donation for which the qualified donation is being sought. 15    (i) Subsection (h) shall not apply with respect to any 16qualified donation by any partnership or pass-through entity 17for which a tax credit is being sought under this Act if 18substantially all of the partnership interests or pass-through 19entity interests in the partnership or pass-through entity are 20held, directly or indirectly, by an individual or members of 21the individual's family. 22    As used in this subsection, "member of the family" means 23the individual's spouse or any person who bears a relationship 24to the individual that is described in subparagraphs (A) 25through (G) of Internal Revenue Code Section 152(d)(2). 26    (j) If a conservation agency becomes unqualified after the   SB4193- 15 -LRB104 21567 HLH 36981 b1effective date of a qualified donation, it shall not require 2any taxpayer to repay tax credits claimed under this Act, nor 3shall such event be cause for any other penalty to be imposed 4on a taxpayer. 5    (k) The credit under this Section is exempt from the 6provisions of Section 250.  7    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.